Tennessee, session 114, SB1851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a)
(1) A person commits an offense who possesses a firearm and:
(A) Has been convicted of a felony crime of violence or an
attempt to commit a felony crime of violence;
(B) Has been convicted of a felony drug offense;
(C) Has been convicted of a felony offense other than an offense
under subdivision (a)(1)(A) or (a)(1)(B);
(D) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921, and is still subject to the
disabilities of such a conviction;
(E) Is prohibited from possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. §
922(g); or
(F) Has been adjudicated as a mental defective, has been
judicially committed to a mental institution pursuant to title 33, or had a
court appoint a conservator for the person by reason of a mental defect.
(2) An offense under subdivision (a)(1)(A) is a Class B felony.
(3) An offense under subdivision (a)(1)(B) is a Class C felony.
SB1851
009696
- 1 -

(4) An offense under subdivision (a)(1)(C) is a Class E felony.
(5) An offense under subdivisions (a)(1)(D)-(F) is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(b) Subdivisions (a)(1)(A)–(F) do not apply if:
(1) The person has been pardoned for the offense;
(2) The conviction has been expunged or otherwise set aside;
(3) The person's civil rights have been restored pursuant to title 40,
chapter 29;
(4) The person has been granted relief of disabilities relative to firearms
under 18 U.S.C. § 925 or by any other statutory procedure or court ruling; or
(5) The person has been granted relief of disabilities relative to firearms
under the applicable law of this or another state relative to a disability arising in
that state.
(c)
(1) A person commits an offense who possesses a deadly weapon with
the intent to employ it during the commission of, attempt to commit, or escape
from a felony offense.
(2) A violation of subdivision (c)(1) is a Class E felony.
(d) If a person is licensed as a federal firearms dealer, is identified as a
responsible party under a federal firearms license, or is employed by a federal firearms
dealer, the determination of whether such an individual possesses firearms that
constitute the business assets or inventory under the federal license must be determined
based upon the applicable federal statutes or the rules, regulations, official letters,
rulings, and publications of the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and
explosives.
- 2 - 009696

(e) A person does not possess a firearm if the firearm is in a safe or similar
container that is securely locked and to which the person does not have the
combination, key, or other means of normal access.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1308(b), is amended by
deleting "§ 39-17-1307(b)(1)" and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)(1)(A) or (B)" and by deleting
subdivisions (a)(8) and (a)(9).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1311, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-10-205, is amended by deleting
"§ 39-17-1307(i)" wherever it appears and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)(1)(F)".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-11-202, is amended by deleting
"§ 39-17-1307(i)" wherever it appears and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)(1)(F)".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-15-405, is amended by deleting
"§ 39-17-1307(i)" wherever it appears and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)(1)(F)".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-16-121, is amended by deleting
"§ 39-17-1307(i)" wherever it appears and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)(1)(F)".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-625(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "and § 39-17-1307(f)" and substituting "and § 39-17-1307(a)(1)(E)".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-625(h)(3), is amended by
deleting "or § 39-17-1307(f)" and substituting "or § 39-17-1307(a)(1)(E)".
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131(a)(2)(B)(i)(t), is amended
by deleting "carrying or".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-116(c)(6)(A)(i), is amended by
deleting "§ 39-17-1307(b) or (c)" and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)".
- 3 - 009696

SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-113(h)(4), is amended by
deleting "or § 39-17-1307(f)" and substituting "or § 39-17-1307(a)(1)(E)".
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351, is amended by deleting
"§ 39-17-1307(b)" wherever it appears and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)".
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1366, is amended by deleting
"§ 39-17-1307(b)" wherever it appears and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)".
SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-14-109(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "§ 39-17-1307(f)(1)" and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)(1)(D)".
SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-29-103, is amended by deleting
"§ 39-17-1307(b), (f)(1), (h)(1)(D), (i), or (j)" wherever it appears and substituting "§ 39-17-
1307(a)(1)".
SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-105(i)(5), is amended by
deleting "§ 39-17-1307(b)(1)(B) and (c)" and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)(1)(B) and (C)".
SECTION 18. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-107(a)(1)(D)(xxx), is
amended by deleting "Section 39-17-1307(f)(1)(A)" and substituting "Section 39-17-
1307(a)(1)(D)".
SECTION 19. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-107(a)(1)(D)(xxxi), is
amended by deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 20. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-107(a)(1)(D)(xxxii), is
amended by deleting "Section 39-17-1307(f)(1)(C)" and substituting "Section 39-17-
1307(a)(1)(E) or (F)".
SECTION 21. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-110(d), is amended by
deleting "§ 39-17-1307(b)(1)(B) and (c)" and substituting "§ 39-17-1307(a)(1)(B) and (C)".
SECTION 22. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-121(a)(3)(B)(xxvi), is
amended by deleting "carrying or".
- 4 - 009696

SECTION 23. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-124, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(32) and substituting:
(32) Unlawful possession of a firearm, under § 39-17-1307(a)(1)(D);
SECTION 24. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-124, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(5) and substituting:
(5) Unlawful possession of a firearm, under § 39-17-1307(a)(1)(D);
SECTION 25. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-501, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (y)(2)(A)-(C) and substituting:
(A) Unlawful possession of a firearm by a person convicted of a felony crime of
violence or an attempt to commit a felony crime of violence, under § 39-17-
1307(a)(1)(A);
(B) Unlawful possession of a firearm by a person convicted of a felony drug
offense, under § 39-17-1307(a)(1)(B);
(C) Unlawful possession of a firearm by a person convicted of a felony offense
other than a felony crime of violence, an attempt to commit a felony crime of violence, or
a felony drug offense, under § 39-17-1307(a)(1)(C); and
SECTION 26. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3051(b)(2)(F), is amended by
deleting "carrying or".
SECTION 27. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-15-106(c)(2), is amended by
deleting "carrying or".
SECTION 28. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(i) and (a)(1)(A)(v).
SECTION 29. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (c)(11), (c)(18), and (c)(19).
- 5 - 009696

SECTION 30. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1352, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (a)(9) and (a)(11).
SECTION 31. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1313(a), is amended by
deleting the phrase "a person who has a valid enhanced handgun carry permit or concealed
handgun carry permit or who lawfully carries a handgun pursuant to § 39-17-1307(g) may," and
substituting "a person who lawfully possesses a firearm may,".
SECTION 32. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i)(v).
SECTION 33. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359(f), is amended by
deleting the last sentence.
SECTION 34. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359(g)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting "or § 39-17-1311(b)(1)(H)(ii)".
SECTION 35. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3051, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(2)(H).
SECTION 36. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-190, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 37. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-103, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(7).
SECTION 38. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-133(a), is amended by
deleting "Except as provided in § 37-1-190, an" and substituting "An".
SECTION 39. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-133, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(4).
SECTION 40. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-153(a)(6), is amended by
deleting "prior to the transfer of a firearm pursuant to § 37-1-190 or" and by deleting "§ 37-1-190
and".
- 6 - 009696

SECTION 41. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-153(f)(1)(A)(i), is amended by
deleting "and is not currently prohibited from possessing or purchasing a firearm pursuant to §
37-1-190".
SECTION 42. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-159, is amended by deleting
subsection (h).
SECTION 43. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(1)(A)(v).
SECTION 44. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(19).
SECTION 45. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1352, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(11).
SECTION 46. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 47. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 7 - 009696